New York, session 2025-2026, A4271.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 10 of section 54 of the state finance law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph w to read as follows: 3 w. Local government capital improvement grant program. (i) (1) For the 4 purposes of this paragraph, "municipality" and "municipalities" shall 5 mean any city, town or village that has a population of less than seven 6 thousand five hundred. 7 (2) For the purposes of this paragraph, "total expenditures" shall 8 mean the total expenditures for a municipality as reported to the state 9 comptroller. 10 (3) For the purposes of this paragraph, "capital improvement projects" 11 shall mean any non-transportation related capital improvement project on 12 property owned by a municipality that has a total cost of one hundred 13 thousand dollars or higher and such project exceeds ten percent of such 14 municipality's total expenditures. 15 (ii) Within the annual amounts appropriated therefor, the secretary of 16 state may award matching grants to municipalities to cover costs associ- 17 ated with capital improvement projects. 18 (iii) The maximum cumulative grant award for a local government capi- 19 tal improvement grant shall not exceed two hundred fifty thousand 20 dollars. 21 (iv) Matching funds equal to at least fifty percent of the total cost 22 of the capital improvement project under the grant approved by the 23 department of state shall be required to receive a local government 24 capital improvement grant. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04896-01-5 A. 4271 2 1 (v) Within one week of the receipt of an application, the department 2 of state shall review the application to ensure the applicant has filed 3 the correct application, and to determine if any required sections of 4 the application contain no information. Within one business day of 5 determining an applicant has filed an incorrect application, or deter- 6 mining an application contains no information in a section required to 7 contain information, the department shall so notify the applicant. 8 Applicants shall be permitted to amend an application found to be miss- 9 ing information, and such application shall be reconsidered for approval 10 if it is amended by the application deadline. If an applicant has 11 submitted an incorrect application, the applicant may submit the correct 12 application to the appropriate program by the deadline for such program 13 for consideration. Under no circumstances shall this subparagraph be 14 deemed to require the extension of any application deadline established 15 by the department, nor shall it obligate the department to conduct a 16 substantive review of the contents of any application outside of the 17 procedures established by the department for the purposes of maintaining 18 the competitive integrity of the grant program. 19 § 2. The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000), or so much thereof 20 as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated to the department of state 21 out of any moneys in the state treasury in the general fund to the cred- 22 it of the local government capital improvement grant program, not other- 23 wise appropriated, and made immediately available, for the purpose of 24 carrying out the provisions of this act. Such moneys shall be payable on 25 the audit and warrant of the comptroller on vouchers certified or 26 approved by the commissioner of education in the manner prescribed by 27 law. 28 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.